Arkansas, session 2025, SB347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Dental services reimbursement — Adult with special needs
dental services cap.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall increase reimbursement
rates for:
(A) Oral and maxillofacial surgeons' dental services,
including anesthesia;
(B) Pediatric dental services, including anesthesia; and
(C) Dental services for adults with special needs.
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2025, the reimbursement rates
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be set to sixty percent (60%)
of the fiftieth percentile for national fees as determined by the annual
*JMB216*
04-14-2025 17:21:20 JMB216

As Engrossed: S4/14/25 SB347
National Dental Advisory Service Comprehensive Fee Report adjusted for the
state.
(b) Beginning on September 1, 2025, the program shall increase the
annual reimbursement cap for dental services for adults with special needs
from five hundred dollars ($500) to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(c) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.

/s/C. Penzo


























04-14-2025 17:21:20 JMB216